Maryland, session 2026, HB1638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 51. KIDS ONLINE PROTECTION AND ANTIGROOMING ACT.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1638*

HOUSE BILL 1638
(B) “CONNECT” MEANS THE ASSOCIATION, LINKING, OR INTERACTION OF
ACCOUNTS ON A COVERED PLATFORM, INCLUDING BY SUBSCRIBING OR FRIENDING.
(C) (1) “COVERED PLATFORM” MEANS AN ONLINE PLATFORM, ONLINE
VIDEO GAME, MESSAGING APPLICATION, OR VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE THAT
ACCESSES THE INTERNET.
(2) “COVERED PLATFORM” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN ENTITY ACTING IN THE ENTITY’S CAPACITY AS:
1. A COMMON CARRIER SERVICE PROVIDER, SUBJECT
TO THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS ACT OF 1934;
2. AN E–MAIL SERVICE PROVIDER;
3. A TELECONFERENCING OR VIDEO CONFERENCING
SERVICE THAT ALLOWS FOR THE RECEPTION AND TRANSMISSION OF REAL–TIME
COMMUNICATION BY AUDIO OR VIDEO SIGNALS, IF:
A. THE SERVICE IS NOT AN ONLINE PLATFORM; AND
B. THE REAL–TIME COMMUNICATION IS INITIATED BY A
UNIQUE LINK OR IDENTIFIER THAT FACILITATES ACCESS; AND
4. A WIRELESS MESSAGING SERVICE WHERE A MESSAGE
IS TRANSMITTED FROM A SENDER TO A RECIPIENT, INCLUDING A SHORT MESSAGING
SERVICE OR MULTIMEDIA MESSAGING SERVICE THAT:
A. IS NOT A COMPONENT OF OR LINKED TO AN ONLINE
PLATFORM; AND
B. EXCLUSIVELY DIRECTLY TRANSMITS TEXT
MESSAGES, PHOTOS, OR VIDEO BY ELECTRONIC MEANS;
(II) AN ENTITY PROVIDING BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS
SERVICE, AS DEFINED IN 47 C.F.R. 54.400; OR
(III) A PLATFORM THAT PRIMARILY PROVIDES CAREER
NETWORKING AND PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT OPPORTUNITIES.

HOUSE BILL 1638 3
(D) (1) “MICROTRANSACTION” MEANS THE PURCHASE OR TRANSFER OF
VIRTUAL CURRENCY ON A COVERED PLATFORM.
(2) “MICROTRANSACTION” INCLUDES A PURCHASE MADE:
(I) IN AN ONLINE VIDEO GAME THAT INVOLVES SURPRISE
MECHANICS, NEW CHARACTERS, OR OTHER IN–GAME ITEMS; AND
(II) USING VIRTUAL CURRENCY THAT IS ABLE TO BE
PURCHASED OR REDEEMED USING CASH OR CREDIT AND IS INCLUDED AS A PART OF
A PAID SUBSCRIPTION SERVICE.
(3) “MICROTRANSACTION” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PURCHASE MADE IN
AN ONLINE VIDEO GAME USING A VIRTUAL CURRENCY THAT IS:
(I) EARNED THROUGH GAME PLAY; AND
(II) NOT OTHERWISE PURCHASABLE OR REDEEMABLE USING
CASH OR CREDIT OR INCLUDED AS PART OF A PAID SUBSCRIPTION SERVICE.
(E) “MINOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) RESIDES IN THE STATE;
(2) IS UNDER THE AGE OF 17 YEARS; AND
(3) IS NOT EMANCIPATED OR MARRIED.
(F) (1) “ONLINE PLATFORM” MEANS A PUBLIC WEBSITE, AN ONLINE
SERVICE, AN ONLINE APPLICATION, OR A MOBILE APPLICATION THAT PRIMARILY
PROVIDES A COMMUNITY FORUM FROM USER–GENERATED CONTENT.
(2) “ONLINE PLATFORM” INCLUDES:
(I) A SOCIAL MEDIA SERVICE;
(II) A SOCIAL NETWORK; AND
(III) A VIRTUAL REALITY ENVIRONMENT.
(3) “ONLINE PLATFORM” DOES NOT INCLUDE A WEBSITE, AN ONLINE
SERVICE, AN ONLINE APPLICATION, OR A MOBILE APPLICATION THAT INCLUDES
CHAT, COMMENT, OR OTHER INTERACTIVE FUNCTIONS THAT ARE INCIDENTAL TO

HOUSE BILL 1638
THE PREDOMINANT PURPOSE OF THE WEBSITE, ONLINE SERVICE, ONLINE
APPLICATION, OR MOBILE APPLICATION.
(G) “ONLINE VIDEO GAME” MEANS A VIDEO GAME THAT ACCESSES THE
INTERNET AND ALLOWS THE USER TO:
(1) CREATE AND UPLOAD CONTENT THAT IS NOT INCIDENTAL TO
GAME PLAY;
(2) ENGAGE IN MICROTRANSACTIONS; AND
(3) COMMUNICATE WITH OTHER USERS.
(H) (1) “PRECISE GEOLOCATION” MEANS GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION
OBTAINED FROM TECHNOLOGY, INCLUDING GLOBAL POSITIONING SYSTEM LEVEL
LATITUDE AND LONGITUDE COORDINATES, THAT IDENTIFIES THE LOCATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL WITHIN 1,750 FEET OF THE INDIVIDUAL, WITH PRECISION AND
ACCURACY.
(2) “PRECISE GEOLOCATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE THE CONTENT OF
COMMUNICATIONS BETWEEN ACCOUNTS.
(I) “SEXUALLY EXPLICIT MATERIAL” MEANS ANY MATERIAL THAT DEPICTS:
(1) SEXUAL INTERCOURSE;
(2) BESTIALITY;
(3) MASTURBATION;
(4) SADISTIC OR MASOCHISTIC ABUSE; OR
(5) THE EXHIBITION OF A PERSON’S GENITALS OR PUBIC AREA.
14–5102.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE APPLIES ONLY IF:
(1) A MINOR USES A COVERED PLATFORM; AND
(2) THE COVERED PLATFORM REASONABLY BELIEVES OR HAS
ACTUAL KNOWLEDGE THAT THE ACCOUNT HOLDER IS A MINOR.

HOUSE BILL 1638 5
(B) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(2) A SCHOOL, INCLUDING A CHILD CARE CENTER, A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE PRIMARY OR SECONDARY SCHOOL, AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, OR AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION;
(3) A PUBLIC LIBRARY;
(4) A NEWS WEBSITE OR APPLICATION THAT INCLUDES VIDEOS,
IMAGES, OR OTHER VIDEO CONTENT ON THE NEWS WEBSITE OR APPLICATION THAT
IS RELATED PRIMARILY TO THE NEWS WEBSITE’S OR APPLICATION’S GATHERING,
REPORTING, OR PUBLISHING OF NEWS CONTENT, IF THE NEWS WEBSITE OR
APPLICATION IS NOT OTHERWISE AN ONLINE PLATFORM;
(5) A SPORTS WEBSITE OR APPLICATION THAT INCLUDES VIDEOS,
IMAGES, OR OTHER VIDEO CONTENT ON THE SPORTS WEBSITE OR APPLICATION
THAT IS RELATED PRIMARILY TO THE SPORTS WEBSITE’S OR APPLICATION’S
GATHERING, REPORTING, OR PUBLISHING OF SPORTS CONTENT, IF THE SPORTS
WEBSITE OR APPLICATION IS NOT OTHERWISE AN ONLINE PLATFORM;
(6) A PRODUCT OR SERVICE THAT FUNCTIONS PRIMARILY AS
BUSINESS–TO–BUSINESS SOFTWARE, INCLUDING CLOUD STORAGE, FILE SHARING,
OR A FILE COLLABORATION SERVICE;
(7) A VIRTUAL PRIVATE NETWORK OR SIMILAR SERVICE THAT EXISTS
PRIMARILY TO ROUTE INTERNET TRAFFIC BETWEEN LOCATIONS;
(8) A FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT INTERNET DOMAIN;
OR
(9) A VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE THAT CONSISTS PRIMARILY OF
ENTERTAINMENT OR OTHER CONTENT THAT:
(I) IS NOT USER–GENERATED OR USER–UPLOADED;
(II) IS PRESELECTED BY THE VIDEO STREAMING SERVICE
PROVIDER; AND
(III) REQUIRES USERS TO REGISTER WITH A METHOD OF
PAYMENT OR DOES NOT PERMIT USERS TO INTERACT SOCIALLY WITH OTHER USERS.

HOUSE BILL 1638
14–5103.
(A) A PERSON WHO OWNS OR OPERATES A COVERED PLATFORM USED BY A
MINOR SHALL:
(1) TAKE REASONABLE MEASURES IN OPERATING THE COVERED
PLATFORM TO PRIORITIZE ACCOUNT PRIVACY; AND
(2) ESTABLISH DEFAULT SAFETY SETTINGS THAT:
(I) PROHIBIT AN ADULT FROM CONNECTING WITH A MINOR
WITHOUT THE EXPRESS CONSENT OF THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE
MINOR;
(II) PROHIBIT AN ADULT NOT CONNECTED TO THE MINOR FROM
MESSAGING THE MINOR ON THE COVERED PLATFORM;
(III) PROHIBIT THE DISCLOSURE OR SHARING OF THE PRECISE
GEOLOCATION OF A MINOR WITHOUT THE EXPRESS PERMISSION OF THE PARENT OR
LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR TO ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT:
1. THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR; OR
2. A REPRESENTATIVE OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT
AGENCY AUTHORIZED UNDER LAW TO RECEIVE THE PRECISE GEOLOCATION OF A
MINOR;
(IV) RESTRICT THE ACCOUNT VISIBILITY OF A MINOR,
INCLUDING CONNECTED ACCOUNTS, TO ONLY ACCOUNTS CONNECTED TO THE
MINOR; AND
(V) ALLOW THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR TO
DECIDE TO BE INFORMED WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME, BY THE COVERED
PLATFORM’S PARENTAL CONTROL INTERFACE OR BY TEXT, VOICE MESSAGE, OR
E–MAIL TO THE PARENT’S OR LEGAL GUARDIAN’S ACCOUNT, IF:
1. THE MINOR IS EXPOSED TO SEXUALLY EXPLICIT
MATERIAL ON THE COVERED PLATFORM; OR
2. THE MINOR CONNECTS TO ANOTHER USER ON THE
COVERED PLATFORM.

HOUSE BILL 1638 7
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A COVERED PLATFORM USED BY A MINOR SHALL ALLOW THE PARENT
OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE MINOR TO:
(I) USE TOOLS OR FEATURES TO MANAGE ACCOUNT SETTINGS;
(II) VIEW CONNECTIONS AND BLOCKED ACCOUNTS;
(III) APPROVE OR BLOCK ACCOUNTS ATTEMPTING TO CONNECT
WITH THE MINOR;
(IV) PROHIBIT OR LIMIT THE ABILITY OF THE MINOR TO ENGAGE
IN MICROTRANSACTIONS; AND
(V) BLOCK THE ABILITY OF THE MINOR TO RECEIVE OR SHARE
SEXUALLY EXPLICIT MATERIAL THROUGH MESSAGES.
(2) THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A MINOR MAY OPT OUT OF
PROTECTIONS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IF THE PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN
PROVIDES EXPRESS CONSENT TO THE COVERED PLATFORM.
(3) THE ITEMS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
MAY BE MODIFIED ONLY BY A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN WHOSE ACCOUNT IS
LINKED TO THE MINOR’S ACCOUNT THROUGH THE PARENTAL SUPERVISION TOOLS
OF THE COVERED PLATFORM.
14–5104.
THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED PLATFORM THAT VIOLATES THIS
SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 FOR EACH
VIOLATION.
14–5105.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION TO ENJOIN ANY ACTS
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE AND TO RECOVER CIVIL PENALTIES AUTHORIZED
UNDER § 14–5104 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) BEFORE INITIATING AN ACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ISSUE A WRITTEN NOTICE OF VIOLATION
TO THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF THE COVERED PLATFORM:
(I) IDENTIFYING EACH ALLEGED VIOLATION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1638
(II) EXPLAINING THE BASIS FOR EACH ALLEGATION.
(2) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED PLATFORM SHALL
HAVE 45 DAYS TO CURE A VIOLATION AFTER RECEIPT OF THE WRITTEN NOTICE
DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) THE OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A COVERED PLATFORM MAY CURE
AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE BY PROVIDING TO THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL WRITTEN PROOF INDICATING THAT THE VIOLATION HAS BEEN CURED AND
NO FURTHER VIOLATIONS WILL OCCUR.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ENFORCEMENT ACTION
AGAINST AN OWNER OR OPERATOR IF THE OWNER OR OPERATOR:
(1) FAILS TO CURE A VIOLATION WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING
THE WRITTEN NOTICE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(1) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) COMMITS ANOTHER VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE AFTER
PROVIDING WRITTEN PROOF OF A CURE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) IN ANY ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO
RECOVER THE COSTS OF THE ACTION.
(E) CIVIL PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE USED
FOR CONSUMER EDUCATION AND THE PROMOTION AND ENFORCEMENT OF
CONSUMER PROTECTION IN THE STATE.
14–5106.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE KIDS ONLINE PROTECTION AND
ANTIGROOMING ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.